Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 14. Foreign Trade Zones.

§ 62.1-159.
“Public corporation” defined.

The term “public corporation,” for the purposes of this chapter, means the Commonwealth of Virginia or any political subdivision thereof or any incorporated municipality therein or any public agency of this Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof or of any municipality therein, or any corporate municipal instrumentality of this Commonwealth or of this Commonwealth and one or more other states.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-118; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-160.
Application by public corporation to establish and operate zone.

Any public corporation of the Commonwealth, as that term is defined in §

62.1-159

, is authorized to make application, individually or jointly with any other public corporation, for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign-trade zone in accordance with an act of Congress approved June 18, 1934, entitled “An act to provide for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of foreign-trade zones on ports of entry of the United States, to expedite and encourage foreign commerce, and for other purposes,” published in volume 48 of United States statutes at large, chapter 590.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-119; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 598.

§ 62.1-161.
Application by private corporation.

Any private corporation hereafter organized under the laws of this Commonwealth for the purpose of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign-trade zone in accordance with the act of Congress referred to in §

62.1-160

is likewise authorized to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign-trade zone in accordance with the act of Congress.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-120; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-162.
Authority to establish and operate zone; conditions and restrictions of act of Congress, etc.

Any public or private corporation authorized by this chapter to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining such foreign-trade zone, whose application is granted pursuant to the terms of such act of Congress is authorized to establish a foreign-trade zone and to operate and maintain it, individually or jointly with any other public corporation, subject to the conditions and restrictions of the act of Congress, and any amendments thereto, and under such rules and regulations and for the period of time that may be prescribed by the board established by the act of Congress to carry out the provisions of the act.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-121; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 598.